Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.08
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor except as otherwise provided in the act.

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 10;

Laws 1979, LB 257, § 7;

Laws 1988, LB 180, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 33.